Hawaii statutes.
§88-59 Acquisition of membership
service. (a) Under rules as the board may adopt, any member may file with
the system a statement of all service as an employee or other service paid for
by the State or a county rendered prior to the member's last becoming a member
that is not credited to the member, for which the member claims prior service
credit, and also a statement of the services for which the member claims
membership service credit and for which the member agrees to have additional
deductions made from the member's compensation or to make a lump sum payment as
described in this section.

(b) After the filing of the statement, the
board shall verify the service claimed and determine the service credit
allowable. Verified prior service shall be credited. Verified membership
service shall be paid for by the member in any one of the following methods, at
the member's option:

(1) If deductions commence or the lump sum payment is
made prior to July 1, 2020:

(A) By deductions from the member's compensation
pursuant to section 414(h)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended,
under the employer pick up plan under section 88-46. An irrevocable payroll
authorization filed by the member for a period not to exceed sixty months shall
remain in effect until the completion of the payroll payments or termination of
employment, whichever is earlier. The member may elect to have:

(i) Deductions from the member's compensation
of twice the contribution rate provided for in section 88-45 over a period
equal to the period for which membership service credit is allowable not to
exceed sixty months; or

(ii) Deductions from the member's compensation
of one and one-half times the contribution rate provided for in section 88-45
over a period equal to twice the period for which membership service credit is
allowable not to exceed sixty months; or

(B) By lump sum payment of contributions
computed at the contribution rate provided for in section 88-45 applied to the
member's monthly rate of compensation at the time of payment multiplied by the
number of months for which membership service credit is allowable; provided
that after July 1, 1982, this method shall not be available to any new member
with fewer than five years of membership service exclusive of any previous
service acquired under subparagraph (A).

(2) If the deductions commence or the lump sum
payment is made after June 30, 2020:

(A) By deductions from the member's
compensation pursuant to section 414(h)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code of
1986, as amended, under the employer pick up plan under section 88-46. An
irrevocable payroll authorization filed by the member for a period not to
exceed sixty months shall remain in effect until the completion of the payroll
payments or termination of employment, whichever is earlier. The amount of the
deductions shall be sufficient to amortize the actuarial cost of the membership
service to be credited, together with interest at the investment yield rate
assumption in effect as of the date the claim for service credit is made, in
level twice-monthly payments over the period specified in the irrevocable
authorization. Service credited shall be proportional on the basis of whole
months. For example, if a member elects to acquire twenty-four months of
service over sixty months and terminates employment after thirty and one-half
months of deductions, the member will acquire twelve months of membership
service credit; or

(B) By lump sum payment equal to the
actuarial cost of the membership service to be credited; provided that the
member has at least five years of membership exclusive of any previous service
acquired under paragraph (1) or subparagraph (A).

The actuarial cost of the
membership service to be credited shall be determined by the actuary for the
system based on the age of the member in full years as of the date the claim
for service credit is made, the investment yield rate assumption in effect as
of the date the claim for service credit is made, the retirement age
eligibility requirements and retirement allowance provisions applicable to the
member, and other actuarial assumptions adopted by the board in effect as of
the date the claim for service credit is made.

The deductions from compensation or lump sum
payment shall be paid to the system and shall be credited to the member's
individual account and become part of the member's accumulated contributions.

(c) Membership service credit, in addition to
any other service credited to the member, shall be allowed for the period for
which the deductions from compensation or lump sum payment have been made as
described in this section; provided that payment shall commence within one year
after the system notifies the member that the service claimed has been verified
and that service credit is allowable; provided further that, for a member who
becomes a member after June 30, 2016:

(1) Membership service credit for prior service or
for service rendered prior to the member's last becoming a member shall be
claimed within one year after the member enters service;

(2) Membership service credit for military service
pursuant to section 88-132.5 shall be claimed within one year after the member
meets the requirements of section 88-132.5(a) or (b); and

(3) Any other membership service credit acquired
pursuant to this section shall be claimed within one year after the member
becomes eligible to receive the service credit upon satisfaction of the
requirements of this section.

(d) The contribution rates under section 88-45
shall be reduced by one and eight-tenths per cent for any service being claimed
prior to July 1, 2020, that was rendered prior to July 1, 1961. [RL 1945, pt of
§704; am L 1949, c 269, pt of §1; am L 1951, c 110, §1(c); RL 1955, §6-35; am L
1961, c 181, §3; HRS §88-59; am L 1969, c 110, pt of §1; am L 1972, c 129, §1;
am L 1982, c 165, §2(12); gen ch 1985; am L 1989, c 100, §1; am L 1997, c 213,
§2; am L 2005, c 58, §5; am L 2008, c 47, §7; am L 2015, c 86, §4]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next